xx: Bienenstich
en: Bienenstich
de: Bienenstich

xx: Donauwelle
en: Donauwelle
de: Donauwelle

xx: Streuselkuchen
en: Streuselkuchen
de: Streuselkuchen

en: Apple streuselkuchen
de: Apfel Streuselkuchen

en: Cherry streuselkuchen
de: Kirsch Streuselkuchen

en: Plum streuselkuchen
de: Pflaumen Streuselkuchen

xx: Zupfkuchen
en: Zupfkuchen
de: Zupfkuchen

en: Banana breads
xx: Banana breads
fr: Gâteaux aux bananes, gâteau aux bananes, gâteaux à la banane, gâteau à la banane, pains à la banane, pain à la banane, pains aux bananes
nl: Bananenbroden, Banaanbroden

en: Yogurt cake
fr: Gâteau au yaourt
hr: Kolač od jogurta
ja: ヨーグルトケーキ
lt: Jogurtiniai tortai, Jogurtiniai pyragai
pt: Bolos de iogurte

en: Almond cakes
de: Mandelkuchen
es: Tartas de almendra
fi: Mantelikakut
fr: Gâteaux aux amandes
hr: Kolačići od badema
nl: Amandelcake
zh: 杏仁蛋糕

en: Soft cake with nuts
fr: Gâteau moelleux aux fruits à coque
hr: Meki kolač s orasima
it: Torta morbida con noci

en: Soft cake filled with fruits, Mini sponge roll filled with fruits
fr: Gâteau moelleux fourré aux fruits, Mini-roulé fourré aux fruits, Mini-cake fourré aux fruits

en: Dessert mixes, Dessert mix
de: Nachtischmischungen, Nachtischmischung
es: Mezclas para postres
fi: jälkiruokajauheet
fr: Préparations pour desserts, préparation pour dessert
he: תערובות קינוח, תערובת קינוחים, תערובת קינוח
hr: Desertne mješavine
it: Preparati per dolci
lt: Desertiniai mišiniai, Mišiniai desertams
nl: Dessertmixes, Toetjesmixes, Dessertmengelingen
pt: Preparados para sobremesas

en: Baking Mixes
nl: Bakmixes, Bakmelanges

en: Apple Pie Mixes
nl: Appeltaartmixes
zh: 苹果派预拌粉

en: Cake mixes, Cake Mix, Preparations for cakes
de: Backmischungen für Kuchen, Kuchenbackmischungen
es: Mezcla para tartas
fi: kakkujauhosekoitukset
fr: Préparations pour gâteaux, préparation pour gâteau
he: תערובות לעוגה
hr: Smjese za kolače
it: Preparati per torte
ja: ケーキミックス
lt: Pyragų mišiniai, Mišiniai pyragams, Tortų mišiniai, Mišiniai tortams
nl: Cakemixes
pl: Mieszanka do ciasta, Mieszanka do ciast

en: Muffins mix
de: Muffin Backmischung
hr: Smjesa za muffine
nl: Muffinmixes

en: Banana bread mixes
fr: Préparations pour banana bread

en: Biscuit mixes
fr: Préparations pour biscuits

en: Cookies mixes
fr: Préparations pour cookies